Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 6 Rhode Island Nonprofit Corporation Act
7-6-16.
Bylaws.

The initial bylaws of a corporation shall be adopted by its board of directors. The power to alter, amend, or repeal the bylaws or adopt new bylaws is vested in the board of directors unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. The bylaws may contain any provisions for the regulation and management of the affairs of a corporation not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-17.
Bylaws and other powers in emergency.

The board of directors of any corporation may adopt emergency bylaws, that are, notwithstanding any different provision contained in this chapter or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, operative during any emergency in the conduct of the affairs of the corporation resulting from an attack on the United States or any nuclear or atomic disaster. The emergency bylaws may make any provision that may be practical and necessary for the circumstances of the emergency, including provisions that:

A meeting of the board of directors may be called by any officer or director in the manner and under the conditions that are prescribed in the emergency bylaws;

The director or directors in attendance at the meeting, or any greater number fixed by the emergency bylaws, constitutes a quorum; and

The officers or other persons designated on a list approved by the board of directors before the emergency, all in the order of priority and subject to the conditions and for the period of time (not longer than reasonably necessary after the termination of the emergency) as is provided in the emergency bylaws or in the resolution approving the list, are, to the extent required to provide a quorum at any meeting of the board of directors, deemed directors for the meeting.

The board of directors, either before or during any emergency, may provide, and from time to time modify, lines of succession in the event that during any emergency any or all officers or agents of the corporation are for any reason rendered incapable of discharging their duties.

The board of directors, either before or during any emergency, may, effective in the emergency, change the head office or designate several alternative head offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

To the extent not inconsistent with any emergency bylaws adopted, the bylaws of the corporation remain in effect during any emergency and upon its termination the emergency bylaws cease to be operative.

Unless otherwise provided in emergency bylaws, notice of any meeting of the board of directors during any emergency may be given only to the directors that it may be feasible to reach at the time and by the means that may be feasible at the time, including publication or radio.

To the extent required to constitute a quorum at any meeting of the board of directors during any emergency, the officers of the corporation who are present are, unless otherwise provided in emergency bylaws, deemed, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, directors for the meeting.

No officer, director, or employee acting in accordance with any emergency bylaws is liable except for willful misconduct. No officer, director, or employee is liable for any action taken by him or her in good faith in any emergency in furtherance of the ordinary affairs of the corporation even though not authorized by the bylaws then in effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-18.
Meetings of members.

Meetings of members may be held at any place, either within or without this state, that is provided in the bylaws. In the absence of any provision, all meetings shall be held at the registered office of the corporation in this state.

An annual meeting of the members shall be held at the time that is provided in the bylaws. Failure to hold the annual meeting at the designated time does not work a forfeiture or dissolution of the corporation.

Special meetings of the members may be called by the president or by the board of directors. Special meetings of the members may also be called by any other officers or persons or number or proportion of members that is provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. In the absence of a provision fixing the number or proportion of members entitled to call a meeting, a special meeting of members may be called by members having one-twentieth (1/20) of the votes entitled to be cast at the meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-19.
Notice of members’ meetings.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, written notice stating the place, day, and hour of the meeting and, in case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be delivered not less than ten (10) nor more than 60 days before the date of the meeting, either personally or by mail, by or at the direction of the president, or the secretary, or the officers or persons calling the meeting, to each member entitled to vote at the meeting. If mailed, the notice is deemed to be delivered when deposited in the United States mail addressed to the member at his or her address as it appears on the records of the corporation, with postage prepaid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-20.
Voting.

The right of the members, or any class or classes of members, to vote may be limited, enlarged, or denied to the extent specified in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. Unless limited, enlarged, or denied, each member, regardless of class, is entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote of members.

A member entitled to vote may vote in person or, unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws provide otherwise, may vote by proxy executed in writing by the member or by his or her authorized attorney in fact. No proxy is valid after eleven (11) months from the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. Where directors or officers are to be elected by members, the bylaws may provide that the elections may be conducted by mail.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide that in all elections for directors every member entitled to vote has the right to cumulate his or her vote and to give one candidate a number of votes equal to his or her vote multiplied by the number of directors to be elected, or by distributing the votes on the same principle among any number of candidates.

If a corporation has no members or its members have no right to vote, the directors have the sole voting power.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-21.
Quorum.

The bylaws may provide the number or percentage of members entitled to vote represented in person or by proxy, or the number or percentage of votes represented in person or by proxy, that constitutes a quorum at a meeting of members. In the absence of any provision, members holding one-tenth (1/10) of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter to be voted upon represented in person or by proxy constitute a quorum. If a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present or represented by proxy is the act of the members unless a greater proportion or voting by classes is required by this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-22.
Board of directors.

The affairs of a corporation are managed by a board of directors. Directors need not be residents of this state or members of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws requires it. The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for directors.

A director shall discharge his or her duties as a director, including his or her duties as a member of a committee:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a similar position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner he or she reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

In discharging his or her duties, a director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the director reasonably believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board of directors of which he or she is not a member if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

A director is not acting in good faith if he or she has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (c) unwarranted.

A director is not liable for any action taken as a director, or any failure to take any action, if he or she performed the duties of his or her office in compliance with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 472, § 1.

7-6-23.
Number and election of directors.

The number of directors of a corporation shall be not less than three (3). Subject to limitation, the number of directors shall be fixed by the bylaws, except as to the number of the first board of directors, which number shall be fixed by the articles of incorporation. The number of directors may be increased or decreased from time to time by amendment to or as provided by the bylaws, unless the articles of incorporation provide that a change in the number of directors shall be made only by amendment of the articles of incorporation. No decrease in number has the effect of shortening the term of any incumbent director. In the absence of a bylaw fixing the number of directors, the number shall be the same as that stated in the articles of incorporation.

The directors constituting the first board of directors shall be named in the articles of incorporation and hold office until the first annual election of directors or for any other period that may be specified in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. Subsequently, directors shall be elected or appointed in the manner and for the terms provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. In the absence of a provision fixing the term of office, the term of office of a director is one year.

Directors may be divided into classes and the terms of office of the several classes need not be uniform. Each director shall hold office for the term for which he or she is elected or appointed and until his or her successor has been elected or appointed and qualified.

A director may be removed from office pursuant to any procedure for removal that is provided in the articles of incorporation or in bylaws and that has been approved by the members of the corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-24.
Vacancies on board of directors.

Any vacancy occurring on the board of directors and any directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws provide that a vacancy or created directorship shall be filled in some other manner, in which case the provision shall control.

A director elected or appointed to fill a vacancy shall be elected or appointed for the unexpired term of the director’s predecessor in office.

Any directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors may be filled by the board of directors for a term of office continuing only until the next election of directors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-25.
Quorum of directors.

A majority of the number of directors fixed by the bylaws, or in the absence of a bylaw fixing the number of directors, then of the number stated in the articles of incorporation, constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws; but in no event does a quorum consist of less than one-quarter (1/4) of the number of the directors fixed or stated.

The act of the majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the board of directors, unless the act of a greater number is required by this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 472, § 1.

7-6-26.
Committees.

The board of directors, by resolution adopted by a majority of the directors in office, may designate and appoint one or more committees, each of which shall consist of two (2) or more directors. These committees, to the extent provided in the resolution, in the articles of incorporation, or in the bylaws of the corporation, have and exercise all the authority of the board of directors, except that no committee has the authority of the board of directors in reference to:

Amending, altering, or repealing the bylaws;

Electing, appointing, or removing any member of any committee or any director or officer of the corporation;

Amending the articles of incorporation, restating articles of incorporation, adopting a plan of merger, or adopting a plan of consolidation with another corporation;

Authorizing the sale, lease, exchange, or mortgage of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the corporation;

Authorizing the voluntary dissolution of the corporation or revoking proceedings for voluntary dissolution; adopting a plan for the distribution of the assets of the corporation; or

Amending, altering, or repealing any resolution of the board of directors which by its terms provides that it shall not be amended, altered, or repealed by the committee.

The designation and appointment of any committee and the delegation to it of authority does not operate to relieve the board of directors, or any individual director of any responsibility imposed upon it or him or her by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-26.1.
Director conflicts of interest.

No contract or transaction between a corporation and one or more of its directors or officers, or between a corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association, or other organization in which one or more of its directors or officers are directors or officers or have a financial interest, is void or voidable nor are the directors or officers liable regarding the contract or transaction solely for this reason, or solely because the director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the board or committee of the board that authorizes the contract or transaction, or solely because his, her, or their votes are counted for the purpose, if:

The material facts as to his, her, or their interest or relationship are disclosed or are known to the board of directors or the committee, and the board of directors or committee authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction by the affirmative votes of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors are less than a quorum; or

The material facts as to his, her, or their interest or relationship are disclosed or are known to the members entitled to vote on the contract or transaction, and the contract or transaction is specifically authorized, approved, or ratified by vote of the members; or

The contract or transaction is fair and reasonable to the corporation.

Common or interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the board of directors or of a committee that authorizes the contract or transaction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 380, § 2.

7-6-27.
Place and notice of directors’ meetings.

Regular or special meetings of the board of directors may be held either within or without this state, and on the notice that the bylaws prescribe. Attendance of a director at any meeting constitutes a waiver of notice of the meeting, except when a director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the board of directors need be specified in the notice or waiver of notice of the meeting.

Except as may be otherwise restricted by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, members of the board of directors or any committee designated by the board may participate in a meeting of the board or committee by means of a conference telephone or similar communications equipment, by means of which all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same time, and participation by that means constitutes presence in person at a meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 329, § 1.

7-6-28.
Officers.

The officers of a corporation consist of a president, one or more vice presidents, if prescribed by the bylaws, a secretary, a treasurer, and any other officers and assistant officers who are deemed necessary, each of whom shall be elected or appointed at the time and in the manner and for the terms not exceeding three (3) years that are prescribed in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. In the absence of any provision, all officers shall be elected or appointed annually by the board of directors. Any two (2) or more offices may be held by the same person, except the offices of president and secretary.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide that any one or more officers of the corporation are ex officio members of the board of directors.

The officers of a corporation may be designated by any additional titles that may be provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-29.
Removal of officers.

Any officer elected or appointed may be removed by the persons authorized to elect or appoint the officer whenever, in their judgment, the best interests of the corporation will be served by removal. The removal of an officer is without prejudice to the contract rights, if any, of the officer removed. Election or appointment of an officer or agent does not of itself create contract rights.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-30.
Books and records.

Each corporation shall keep correct and complete books and records of account and shall keep minutes of the proceedings of its members, board of directors, and committees having any of the authority of the board of directors; and shall keep at its registered office or principal office in this state a record of the names and addresses of its members entitled to vote. All books and records of a corporation may be inspected by any member, or his or her agent or attorney, for any proper purpose at any reasonable time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-31.
Dividends prohibited.

A corporation may issue shares to its members, but no dividend shall be paid on the shares and no part of the income or profit of a corporation shall be distributed to its members, directors, or officers, except that dividends may be paid and income or profit may be distributed to its members by a corporation all of the members of which are corporations to which this chapter applies. A corporation may pay compensation in a reasonable amount to its members, directors, or officers for services rendered; may confer benefits upon its members in conformity with its purposes; and upon dissolution or final liquidation, may make distributions to its members as permitted by this chapter; and no payment, benefit, or distribution is deemed to be a dividend or a distribution of income or profit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 472, § 1.

7-6-32.
Loans to directors prohibited.

No loans shall be made by a corporation to its directors. Any director who assents to or participates in the making of any loan is liable to the corporation for the amount of loan until its repayment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-33.
Incorporators.

One or more persons may incorporate a corporation by signing and delivering articles of incorporation in duplicate to the secretary of state.

Until the corporation has duly qualified members, or if it is intended that the corporation will have no members, until the first meeting of its board of directors, the incorporator or incorporators, at any meeting or meetings that may be held for the purposes provided for in this section, shall manage the affairs of the corporation and for that purpose will have the powers otherwise vested by this chapter in the board of directors or members.

The incorporator or incorporators calling a meeting under this section shall give at least three (3) days’ notice of the meeting by mail to each incorporator, which notice shall state the time and place of the meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-34.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The period of duration, which may be perpetual;

The purpose or purposes for which the corporation is organized;

Any provisions, not inconsistent with the law, that the incorporators elect to set forth in the articles of incorporation for the regulation of the internal affairs of the corporation, including a provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director to the corporation or to its members for monetary damages for breach of the director’s duty as a director. However, the provision does not eliminate or limit the liability of a director:

For any breach of the director’s duty of loyalty to the corporation or its members;

For acts or omissions not in good faith or that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law; or

For any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit, and also including any provision that under this chapter is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws.

No provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director will be effective with respect to causes of action arising prior to the inclusion of the provision in the articles of incorporation of the corporation;

The address of its initial registered office, and the name of its initial registered agent at the address;

The number of directors constituting the initial board of directors, and the names and addresses of the persons who are to serve as the initial directors;

The name and residence or business address of each incorporator.

It is not necessary to set forth in the articles of incorporation any of the corporate powers enumerated in this chapter.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide that a change in the number of directors shall be made only by amendment to the articles of incorporation, a change in the number of directors made by amendment to the bylaws is controlling. In all other cases, whenever a provision of the articles of incorporation is inconsistent with a bylaw, the provision of the articles of incorporation is controlling.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 472, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 6.

7-6-35.
Filing of articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation shall be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of incorporation conform to law, the secretary of state shall, when all fees have been paid as in this chapter prescribed:

Endorse on the original the word “Filed”, and the month, day, and year of the filing;

File the original in the secretary of state’s office; and

Issue a certificate of incorporation.

The certificate of incorporation shall be delivered to the incorporators or their representative.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 4.

7-6-36.
Effect of issuance of certificate of incorporation.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of incorporation, or upon a later date, not more than 30 days after the filing of articles of incorporation, that is set forth in the articles, the corporate existence begins, and the certificate of incorporation is conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required to be performed by the incorporators have been complied with and that the corporation has been incorporated under this chapter, except as against the state in a proceeding to cancel or revoke the certificate of incorporation or for involuntary dissolution of the corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-37.
Organization meetings.

After the issuance of the certificate of incorporation an organizational meeting of the board of directors named in the articles of incorporation may be held, either within or without this state, at the call of a majority of the incorporators, for the purpose of adopting bylaws, electing officers, and the transaction of any other business that may come before the meeting. The incorporators calling the meeting shall give at least three (3) days’ notice of the meeting by mail to each named director, which notice states the time and place of the meeting.

A first meeting of the members may be held at the call of the directors, or a majority of them, upon at least three (3) days’ notice, for any purposes that are stated in the notice of the meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-38.
Right to amend articles of incorporation.

A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation, from time to time, in any respect desired, as long as its articles of incorporation, as amended, contain only provisions that are lawful under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-39.
Procedure to amend articles of incorporation.

Amendments to the articles of incorporation are made in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote on the amendments, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth the proposed amendment and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote on it, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting forth the proposed amendment or a summary of the changes to be effected by the amendment shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. The proposed amendment is adopted upon receiving at least a majority of the votes that members present at the meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote on it, an amendment is adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Any number of amendments may be submitted and voted upon at any one meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-40.
Articles of amendment.

The articles of amendment shall be executed in duplicate by the corporation by its president or a vice president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary and shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The amendment so adopted;

If there are members entitled to vote on the amendment:

A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of members at which the amendment was adopted, that a quorum was present at the meeting, and that the amendment received at least a majority of the votes that members present at the meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast; or

A statement that the amendment was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members entitled to vote on it; and

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote on the amendment, a statement of the fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which the amendment was adopted, and a statement of the fact that the amendment received the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1.

7-6-41.
Effectiveness of amendment.

The articles of amendment shall be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of amendment conform to law, the secretary of state shall, when all fees have been paid as in this chapter prescribed:

Endorse on the original the word “Filed”, and the month, day, and year of the filing;

File the original in the secretary of state’s office; and

Issue a certificate of amendment.

The certificate of amendment shall be delivered to the corporation or its representative.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of amendment by the secretary of state, or upon any later date, not more than 30 days after the filing of articles of amendment, that is set forth in the articles, the amendment becomes effective and the articles of incorporation are deemed to be amended accordingly.

No amendment affects any existing cause of action in favor of or against the corporation, or any pending action to which the corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than members; and, in the event the corporate name is changed by amendment, no action brought by or against the corporation under its former name abates for that reason.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 4.

7-6-41.1.
Certificate of correction.

Whenever any instrument authorized to be filed with the secretary of state under any provision of this chapter has been so filed and is an inaccurate record of the corporate action therein referred to, or was defectively or erroneously executed, sealed, or acknowledged, the instrument may be corrected by filing with the secretary of state a certificate of correction, which must be executed, acknowledged, and filed in accordance with this section.

The corrected instrument must be specifically designated as such in its heading, specify the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected, and set forth the entire instrument in corrected form.

The certificate of correction shall be executed by the corporation, by its president or vice president, and by its secretary or an assistant secretary and shall set forth:

The name of the corporation.

The inaccuracy or defect to be corrected and set forth the portion of the instrument in corrected form.

If there are members entitled to vote on the correction:

A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of members at which the correction was adopted, that a quorum was present at the meeting, and that the correction received at least a majority of the votes that members present at the meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast; or

A statement that the correction was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members entitled to vote on it.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote on the correction, a statement of the fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which the correction was adopted, and a statement of the fact that the correction received the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

The entire instrument in corrected form attached.

An instrument corrected in accordance with this section is effective as of the date the original instrument was filed, except as to those individuals who are substantially and adversely affected by the correction and as to those individuals the instrument as corrected is effective from its filing date.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 81, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 6.

7-6-42.
Restated articles of incorporation.

A domestic corporation may at any time restate its articles of incorporation as previously amended by filing with the secretary of state restated articles of incorporation. The restated articles of incorporation may include one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation adopted in accordance with the provisions of §

7-6-39

. The corporation may restate articles of incorporation in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote on the restated articles, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth the proposed restated articles of incorporation and directing that they be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote on them, which may be either an annual or a special meeting.

Written notice setting forth the proposed restated articles or a summary of their provisions shall be given to each member entitled to vote on them, within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. If the meeting is an annual meeting, the proposed restated articles or a summary of their provisions may be included in the notice of the annual meeting.

At the meeting, a vote of the members entitled to vote on the restated articles shall be taken on them, which shall be adopted upon receiving the affirmative vote of a majority of the members entitled to vote on them present at the meeting or represented by proxy.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote on them, the proposed restated articles shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Upon approval, restated articles of incorporation shall be executed by the corporation by its president or vice president and by its secretary or assistant secretary and shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The period of its duration;

The purpose or purposes that the corporation is authorized to pursue;

Any other provisions, not inconsistent with law, that are then set forth in the articles of incorporation as previously amended, except that it is not necessary to set forth in the restated articles of incorporation the registered office of the corporation, its registered agent, its directors, or its incorporators.

The restated articles of incorporation shall state that they correctly set forth the provisions of the articles of incorporation as previously amended, that they have been duly adopted as required by law, and the additional amendments to the articles of incorporation, if any, together with a statement that such additional amendments were adopted in accordance with the provisions of §

7-6-39

, and a further statement that, except for the designated amendments, if any, the restated articles of incorporation correctly set forth without change the corresponding provisions of the articles of incorporation as previously amended, and that the restated articles of incorporation, together with the designated amendments, if any, supersede the original articles of incorporation and all previous amendments to the articles of incorporation.

The restated articles of incorporation shall be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the restated articles conform to law, the secretary of state shall, when all fees have been paid as in this chapter prescribed:

Endorse on the original the word “Filed”, and the month, day, and year of the filing;

File the original in the secretary of state’s office;

Issue a restated certificate of incorporation.

The restated certificate of incorporation shall be delivered to the corporation or its representative.

Upon the issuance of the restated certificate of incorporation by the secretary of state, the restated articles of incorporation become effective and supersede the original articles of incorporation and all amendments to them.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 4; P.L. 2012, ch. 81, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 103, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 6.

7-6-43.
Procedure for merger.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in any general or public law, rule, or regulation, any two (2) or more entities, whether defined in §

7-6-2

, §

7-1.2-106

, §

7-13-1

, or §

7-16-2

, may merge into one of the entities pursuant to a plan of merger approved in the manner provided in this chapter. This section does not apply to insurance holding company systems as defined in §

27-35-1

.

Each entity shall adopt a plan of merger setting forth:

The names of the entities proposing to merge, and the name of the entity into which they propose to merge, which is subsequently designated as the surviving entity;

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger;

A statement of any changes in the articles of incorporation of the surviving entity to be effected by the merger; and

Such other provisions regarding the proposed merger that are deemed necessary or desirable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 4; P.L. 2021, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

7-6-44.
Procedure for consolidation.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in any general or public law, rule, or regulation, any two (2) or more entities, whether defined in §

7-6-2

, §

7-1.2-106

, §

7-13-1

, or §

7-16-2

, may consolidate into one of the entities pursuant to a plan of consolidation approved in the manner provided in this chapter. This section does not apply to insurance holding company systems as defined in §

27-35-1

.

Each entity shall adopt a plan of consolidation setting forth:

The names of the entities proposing to consolidate, and the name of the new entity into which they propose to consolidate, which is subsequently designated as the new entity;

The terms and conditions of the proposed consolidation;

Regarding the new entity, all of the statements required to be set forth in articles of incorporation for entities organized under this chapter; and

Any other provisions regarding the proposed consolidation that are deemed necessary or desirable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 380, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 444, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 4; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 4; P.L. 2021, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 335, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.